Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.071

Milk hauler's license—Endorsements.

A milk hauler must obtain a milk hauler's license to conduct the operation under this chapter. A milk hauler's license is not transferable with respect to persons or locations or both. The license, issued by the director upon approval of an application for the license and compliance with the provisions of this chapter, shall contain the license number, name, residence, and place of business, if any, of the licensee. A milk hauler's license shall also contain endorsements for individual milk transport vehicles. The license plate number and registration number for each milk transport vehicle shall be listed on the endorsement.

[ 1995 c 374 s 2; 1994 c 143 s 205.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.